Maryland, session 2025, SB0523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
9–1110.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING TEMPORARY
EMPLOYEES AND PART–TIME EMPLOYEES, OF ALL UNITS IN THE EXECUTIVE,
JUDICIAL, AND LEGISLATIVE BRANCHES OF STATE GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING ANY
UNIT WITH AN INDEPENDENT PERSONNEL SYSTEM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0523*

SENATE BILL 523
(B) ON REQUEST, AN EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE
ENTITLED TO CANCER SCREENING LEAVE WITH PAY.
(C) AN EMPLOYEE MAY:
(1) USE UP TO 4 HOURS OF CANCER SCREENING LEAVE IN ANY
12–MONTH PERIOD FOR CANCER SCREENING; AND
(2) USE CANCER SCREENING LEAVE ONLY AFTER OBTAINING
APPROVAL FROM THE EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING CANCER
SCREENING LEAVE, INCLUDING REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH CONDITIONS AND
PROCEDURES FOR REQUESTING AND APPROVING CANCER SCREENING LEAVE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.